Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1741.06
Handicapped parking infraction; trial; rights.

The trial of any person for a handicapped parking infraction shall be by the court without a jury. All other rights provided by the Constitution of the United States made applicable to the states by the Fourteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Nebraska shall apply to persons charged with a handicapped parking infraction.

Laws 1993, LB 632, § 6.